New York, session 2025-2026, A9058.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 28-317.5 of the administrative code of the city of 2 New York, as amended by section 3 of part A of local law number 126 of 3 the city of New York for the year 2021, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 28-317.5 [Annual] Biannual certification. The owner or operator of a 5 cooling tower shall file [an annual] a biannual certification that such 6 cooling tower was inspected, tested, cleaned and disinfected in compli- 7 ance with section 17-194.1 of [the administrative code] this chapter and 8 the rules of the department of health and mental hygiene, and that a 9 maintenance program and plan has been developed and implemented as 10 required by such section. Such biannual certification shall be submitted 11 [by November first] in January and July of each year, or by [a date] 12 dates otherwise specified in the rules of the department. [Consecutive 13 annual certifications shall be submitted at least 90 days apart.] The 14 department of health and mental hygiene shall send an electronic remind- 15 er to each owner or operator of a cooling tower at least 30 days before 16 [such] each certification submission deadline. Such electronic reminder 17 shall include a link to the website where such [certification] certif- 18 ications may be submitted. 19 § 2. Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph 2 of subdivision e and 20 paragraph 1 of subdivision h of section 17-194.1 of the administrative 21 code of the city of New York, subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph 2 22 of subdivision e as added by local law number 77 of the city of New York 23 for the year 2019 and paragraph 1 of subdivision h as amended by local EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13604-06-6 A. 9058--A 2 1 law number 76 of the city of New York for the year 2019, are amended to 2 read as follows: 3 (a) Where the results of any such test indicate levels of microbes 4 that are indicative of a maintenance deficiency requiring mitigation, 5 including but not limited to maintenance to prevent potential health 6 risks, the owner of the building that has such cooling tower shall, 7 [within] as soon as possible, but no later than 48 hours after such 8 owner knows or reasonably should know of such results, clean and disin- 9 fect the cooling tower in accordance with the rules of the department. 10 (b) Where the results of any such test indicate levels of microbes 11 that present a serious health threat, the owner of the building that has 12 such cooling tower shall, [within] as soon as possible, but no later 13 than 24 hours after such owner knows or reasonably should know of such 14 results, (i) notify the department and (ii) clean and disinfect the 15 cooling tower, including an additional application of biocide, in 16 accordance with the rules of the department. 17 1. An owner shall keep and maintain records of all inspections and 18 tests performed pursuant to this section for at least [three] ten years. 19 An owner shall maintain a copy of the maintenance program and plan 20 required by subdivision c of this section on the premises where a cool- 21 ing tower is located. Such records and plan shall be made available to 22 the department immediately upon request. 23 § 3. Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph 2 of subdivision e, para- 24 graph 1 of subdivision h and subparagraph (i) of paragraph 2 of subdivi- 25 sion i of section 17-194.1 of the administrative code of the city of New 26 York, subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph 2 of subdivision e and 27 paragraph 1 of subdivision h as amended by local law number 159 of the 28 city of New York for the year 2025 and subparagraph (i) of paragraph 2 29 of subdivision i as added by local law number 77 of the city of New York 30 for the year 2015, are amended to read as follows: 31 (a) Where the results of any such test indicate levels of microbes 32 that are indicative of a maintenance deficiency requiring mitigation, 33 including but not limited to maintenance to prevent potential health 34 risks, the owner of the building that has such cooling tower shall, 35 [within] as soon as possible, but no later than 48 hours after such 36 owner knows or reasonably should know of such results, clean and disin- 37 fect the cooling tower in accordance with the rules of the department. 38 (b) Where the results of any such test indicate levels of microbes 39 that present a serious health threat, the owner of the building that has 40 such cooling tower shall, [within] as soon as possible, but no later 41 than 24 hours after such owner knows or reasonably should know of such 42 results, (i) notify the department and (ii) clean and disinfect the 43 cooling tower, including an additional application of biocide, in 44 accordance with the rules of the department. 45 1. An owner shall keep and maintain records of all inspections and 46 tests performed pursuant to this section for at least [three] ten years. 47 An owner shall maintain a copy of the maintenance program and plan 48 required by subdivision c of this section on the premises where a cool- 49 ing tower is located. Such records and plan shall be made available to 50 the department immediately upon request. 51 (i) Any owner of a building who violates any provision of this section 52 or any of the rules promulgated thereunder shall be liable for a civil 53 penalty of not more than [$2,000] $2,500 for a first violation, and not 54 more than [$5,000] $7,000 for a second or subsequent violation, except 55 that such owner shall be liable for a penalty of not more than [$10,000] A. 9058--A 3 1 $12,500 for any violation that is accompanied by or results in a fatali- 2 ty or serious injury. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 4 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to subpara- 5 graphs (a) and (b) of paragraph 2 of subdivision e of section 17-194.1 6 of the administrative code of the city of New York made by section two 7 of this act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall have 8 become a law; and provided, further, that if local law number 159 of the 9 city of New York for the year 2025 shall not have taken effect on or 10 before such date then the amendments to subparagraphs (a) and (b) of 11 paragraph 2 of subdivision e, and paragraph 1 of subdivision h of 12 section 17-194.1 of the administrative code of the city of New York made 13 by section three of this act shall take effect on the same date and in 14 the same manner as such local law of the city of New York for the year 15 2025 takes effect. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 16 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 17 this act on its effective date are authorized and directed to be made 18 and completed on or before such effective date.